Washington statutes.
RCW 9.40.120

Incendiary devices—Penalty.

Every person who possesses, manufactures, or disposes of an incendiary device knowing it to be such is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW, and upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment in a state prison for a term of not more than ten years.

[ 2003 c 53 s 25; 1999 c 352 s 5; 1971 ex.s. c 302 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 79 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Application—1999 c 352 ss 3-5: See note following RCW 9.94A.515.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 302: See note following RCW 9.41.010.